Washington statutes.
RCW 35.107.080

Ownership change in participating projects.

If a qualifying project participating in the property tax reinvestment program under this chapter changes ownership, the property continues to qualify for the reinvestment, if the new owner complies with all of the application requirements, procedures, terms, conditions, and reporting requirements under this chapter, and meets all of the criteria established by the city to which the application was submitted under this chapter.

[ 2019 c 273 s 9.]